South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5001.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-1-130 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-1-130.  (A) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall examine every applicant for a driver's license, except as otherwise provided in this article. All examinations required by this section must be administered in the English language only. The examination shall include a test of the applicant's eyesight, his ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic, and his knowledge of the traffic laws of this State and shall include an actual demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of the type of motor vehicle, including motorcycles, for which a license is sought. The department may require a further physical and mental examination as it considers necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle upon the highways, the further examination to be at the applicant's expense. The department shall make provisions for giving an examination in the county where the applicant resides. The department shall charge an appropriate fee for each complete examination or reexamination required in this article. (B) The department must require all persons obtaining an initial driver's license, and who are required to complete a driver's education course as defined in Section 56-1-175 or 56-1-180, to take the work zone safety program course as established in Section 56-1-219. (C) No persons, except those exempted under Section 56-1-30 and Section 56-1-50(E), or those holding beginners' permits under Section 56-1-50, shall operate any classification of motor vehicle without first being examined and duly licensed by the driver examiner as a qualified driver of that classification of motor vehicle. (D)(1) A basic driver's license authorizes the licensee to operate motor vehicles, autocycles, motorcycle three-wheel vehicles, excluding a motorcycle with a detachable side car, or combinations of vehicles which do not exceed twenty-six thousand pounds gross vehicle weight rating; provided, that the driver has successfully demonstrated the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle in this category.  A basic driver's license also authorizes the licensee to operate farm trucks provided for in Sections 56-3-670, 56-3-211, and 56-3-215, which are used exclusively by the owner for agricultural, horticultural, and dairying operations or livestock and poultry raising. Notwithstanding another provision of law, the holder of a conditional license, or special restricted license operating a farm truck for the purposes provided in this subsection, may operate the farm truck without an accompanying adult after six o'clock a.m. and no later than nine o'clock p.m., but may not operate a farm truck on a freeway. A person operating a farm truck while holding a conditional driver's license or a special restricted license may not use the farm truck for ordinary domestic purposes or general transportation. (2) A classified driver's license shall authorize the licensee to operate a motorcycle, motorcycle three-wheel vehicle, including a motorcycle with a detachable side car, or those vehicles in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds gross vehicle weight rating which are indicated by endorsement on the license. The endorsement may include classifications such as: motorcycles, two-axle trucks, three-or more axle trucks, combination of vehicles, motor buses, or oversize or overweight vehicles. The department shall determine from the driving demonstration the endorsements to be indicated on the license. (E) The department may not administer a driver's license examination, or any portion of it, in a language other than English. The department may not provide an interpreter or translation services for any driver's license examination. This subsection does not prohibit the use of American Sign Language for applicants who are deaf or hard of hearing, provided that the examination content remains in English. SECTION 2.  If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----